District of Columbia statutes.
44-101.01

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to set uniform, minimum standards of licensure for community residence facilities currently regulated under Chapter 34 of Title 22 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations and other facilities when they provide services that assist residents with the activities of daily living. This chapter creates a new category of licensure called “assisted living residence”.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 101, 47 DCR 2647

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-701.01.